Wisconsin, session 2025, SB245.
do enact as follows:SB245,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB245,2,22(1) School-centered mental health program; pilot.SB245,2,33(a) In this subsection:SB245,2,541. “Provider” means an organization that operates a school-centered mental 5health program.SB245,2,762. “School-centered mental health program” means a program that satisfies 7all of the following criteria:SB245,2,98a. The program serves at-risk pupils and families at each school at which the 9program is operated.SB245,2,1110b. The program actively engages each participating pupil and the pupil’s 11family and other identified supportive individuals in the participating pupil’s life.SB245,2,1212c. The program provides services to each participating pupil year-round.SB245,2,1513d. The program includes evidence-based individual or family therapy at the 14school at which the program is operated, at each participating pupil’s home, or 15elsewhere in the community.SB245,2,2116e. The program provides family coaching that is aligned with a participating 17pupil’s therapeutic goals and includes skill-building, parent education, home visits 18to assess family needs, family wellness checks and support, assistance in accessing 19after-school and mentoring programs, education about the participating pupil’s 20diagnosis, treatment, and medications, and guidance on how to support the 21participating pupil at home and in school.SB245,3,222f. The program actively supports families in connecting to community health 1services and services addressing social determinants of health needs to establish 2primary care providers.SB245,3,43g. The program includes classroom observations for the purpose of 4collaborating with school staff to develop pupil-specific behavior interventions.SB245,3,55h. The program facilitates school staff training and collaboration.SB245,3,86i. The program includes a process for measuring and reporting the program’s 7effect on pupils and families, including improvement in social determinants of 8health and reduction of symptoms related to mental health conditions.SB245,3,159(b) In each fiscal year of the 2025-27 biennium, the department of health 10services shall distribute an amount determined by the secretary of health services 11to a provider to operate a school-centered mental health program at 2 schools in this 12state that are selected in accordance with par. (c) for 2 school years. The provider 13shall use moneys distributed under this paragraph to support full-time therapist 14positions, family coach positions, and other positions necessary to operate the 15school-centered mental health program.SB245,3,1716(c) The provider shall select schools to participate in the school-centered 17mental health program under par. (b) as follows:SB245,3,19181. One school shall be physically located in a rural school district and one 19school shall be physically located in a suburban or urban school district.SB245,3,20202. Each school shall demonstrate all of the following to the provider:SB245,3,2121a. That the school currently offers behavioral health resources to pupils.SB245,3,2322b. That the school is willing and able to facilitate a survey to school staff, 23pupils, and parents of pupils related to the program operated under par. (b).SB245,4,21c. That, upon request, the school is willing and able to provide pupil data to 2the provider for the report required under sub. (2).SB245,4,33(2) Report on school-centered mental health program.SB245,4,94(a) A provider that receives money from the department of health services 5under sub. (1) (b) shall by no later than 6 months after the last day of the 2nd school 6year during which the provider operates the program under sub. (1), submit to the 7department of health services a report on the effect of the school-centered mental 8health program on pupils and families. The provider shall include in the report 9under this paragraph at least all of the following:SB245,4,10101. Changes in social determinants of health for pupils and families.SB245,4,12112. Changes related to symptoms of mental health conditions experienced by 12pupils and families.SB245,4,15133. The impact of the program on pupils’ academic performance and the social 14and emotional growth of pupils at participating schools, as reported on surveys 15facilitated by participating schools.SB245,4,1816(b) By no later than 14 days after receiving a report under par. (a), the 17department of health services shall distribute the report received under par. (a) to 18the legislature under s. 13.172 (2).SB245,4,1919